Louisiana, session 2026, HB461.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.28(A)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 40:1730.28.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1730.28. Mandatory adoption of certain nationally recognized codes and standards
as the state uniform construction code; adoption by reference
A. Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section and R.S. 40:1730.28.6,
the council shall evaluate, adopt, and amend only the latest editions of the following
as the State Uniform Construction Code:
* * *
§1730.28.6. Local option for resilient construction
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the governing
authority of any parish or municipality may, by local ordinance, elect to require that
all new residential construction, reconstruction, or residential re-roofing projects
involving the replacement of fifty percent or more of the total roof area meet or
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1245 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 461
exceed the FORTIFIED Home™ standards as established by the Insurance Institute
for Business & Home Safety, or IBHS.
B. The authority granted in this Section is strictly a local option and shall not
be construed to require any parish or municipality to adopt standards beyond the
State Uniform Construction Code unless the local governing authority affirmatively
elects to do so by ordinance.
C. Any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this Section shall require
verification of the applicable FORTIFIED™ designation by an IBHS-certified
evaluator prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy or completion.
D. A parish or municipality that adopts such an ordinance shall notify the
Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council at least sixty days prior to the
effective date of the local ordinance.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.